California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) For group coverage, specifically describe continuation/conversion provisions applicable to the certificate and group policy.

(c) Describe waiver of premium
 provisions or state that there are no waiver of premium provisions.

(d) State whether or not the company has a right to change premium, and if that right exists, describe clearly and concisely each circumstance under which the premium may change.

10.ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE, ORGANIC DISORDERS, AND RELATED MENTAL DISEASES.

(State that the policy provides coverage for insureds clinically diagnosed as having Alzheimer’s Disease, organic disorders, or related degenerative and dementing illnesses. Specifically describe each benefit screen or other policy provision that provides preconditions to the availability of policy benefits for that insured.)

11.PREMIUM.

(a) State the total annual premium for the policy.

(b) If the premium varies with an applicant’s choice among benefit options, indicate the portion of annual premium which corresponds to each benefit option.

12.ADDITIONAL FEATURES.

(a) Indicate if medical underwriting is used.

(b) Describe other important features.

13.INFORMATION AND COUNSELING. The California Department of Insurance has prepared a Consumer Guide to Long-Term Care Insurance. This guide can be obtained by calling the Department of Insurance toll-free telephone number. This number is 1-800-927-HELP. Additionally, the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program (HICAP) administered by the California Department of Aging, provides long-term care insurance counseling to
 California senior citizens. Call the HICAP toll-free telephone number 1-800-434-0222 for a referral to your local HICAP office.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 947, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10233.6.

A certificate issued pursuant to a group long-term care insurance policy, which policy is delivered or issued for delivery in this state, shall include all of the following:

(a) A description of the principal benefits and coverage provided in the policy.

(b) A statement of the principal exclusions, reductions, and limitations contained in the policy.

(c) A statement of
 the terms under which the policy or certificate, or both, may be continued in force or discontinued, including any reservation in the policy of a right to change premiums.

(d) A statement that the group master policy determines governing contractual provisions.

(e) An explanation of the insured’s rights regarding continuation, conversion, and replacement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1132, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10233.7.

No policy may be advertised, marketed, or offered as long-term care or nursing home insurance unless it complies with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1273, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

10233.8.

(a) A long-term care insurance policy or certificate issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2020, shall not do any of the following based solely and without any additional actuarial risks upon the status of a person as a living organ donor:

(1) Refuse to insure, or refuse to continue to insure, the person under a long-term care insurance policy or certificate.

(2) Limit the amount, extent, or kind of coverage available to the person under a long-term care insurance policy or certificate.

(3) Charge the person a different rate for the same coverage under a long-term care insurance policy or
 certificate.

(4) Otherwise discriminate in the offering, issuance, cancellation, amount of coverage, price, or any other condition of a long-term care insurance policy or certificate for the person.

(b) With respect to any health condition other than being a living organ donor, a person who is a living organ donor shall be subject to the same standards of sound actuarial principles or actual or reasonably anticipated experience as persons who are not living organ donors.

(c) For purposes of this section, “living organ donor” means an individual who has donated all or part of an organ and is not deceased.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 316, Sec. 5.   (AB 1223)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration and Enforcement [10234. - 10234.7.]

10234.

The commissioner shall, as required by this chapter, or from time to time as conditions warrant, pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, adopt reasonable regulations, and amendments and additions thereto, as are necessary to administer this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1273, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.2.

(a) In addition to all other powers and remedies vested in the commissioner by law, the commissioner shall have administrative authority to assess the penalties prescribed in this article for violation of any provision in this chapter against insurers, brokers, agents, and other entities which have been determined by the commissioner to be engaged in the business of insurance.

(b) Upon a showing of a violation of this chapter in any civil action, a court may also assess the
 penalties prescribed in this article. The court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff who establishes a violation of this chapter.

(c) Actions for injunctive relief, penalties prescribed in this article, damages, restitution, and all other remedies in law or equity, may be brought in superior court by the Attorney General, a district attorney, or city attorney on behalf of the people of the State of California for violation of any provision in this chapter. The court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff who establishes a violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1132, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.3.

(a) Any broker, agent, or other entity determined by the commissioner to engage in the business of insurance, other than an insurer, who violates this chapter is liable for an administrative penalty of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each first violation. The penalty for committing a subsequent or a knowing violation of this chapter shall be not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation. The penalty for inappropriate replacement of long-term care
 coverage shall be not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation.

(b) Any insurer that violates this chapter is liable for an administrative penalty of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each first violation. The penalty for committing a subsequent or knowing violation shall be not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation. The penalty for violating this chapter in a manner indicating a general business practice shall reflect the magnitude of the violation against the public interest and shall be not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(c) Penalties shall be paid to the Insurance Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1132, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.4.

In addition to the assessment of penalties and other applicable remedies, the commissioner may take the following actions upon determination that a violation of this chapter, or a regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter, has occurred:

(a) Suspend or revoke the license of any broker, agent, or other producer licensed by the department.

(b) Suspend an insurer’s certificate of authority to transact disability insurance.

(c) Order any broker, agent, insurer, or other entity determined by the commissioner to be engaged in the business of insurance, to cease marketing in California a particular policy form of long-term care insurance, to cease marketing any long-term care insurance, or to take such actions as are necessary to comply with this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1132, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.5.

(a) Any broker, agent, insurer, or other entity within the jurisdiction of the department who is charged with a violation of this chapter shall be afforded due process through proper notice and public hearing, if requested, before a penalty may be assessed under Section 10234.3, an order issued under Section 10234.4, or other remedy imposed by the commissioner.

(b) Written notice, served by registered mail, shall include:

(1) A summary of the facts establishing reasonable cause that a violation has occurred.

(2) Citation of the code section or other standard allegedly violated.

(3) A statement of the commissioner’s intent to assess a penalty including the amount of the penalty, or to seek another remedy.

(4) A statement of the respondent’s right to elect any of the following:

(A) To accept assessment of the penalty or other remedy as stated in the notice.

(B) To respond to the charge in writing, after which the commissioner may issue a final order or set a hearing.

(C) To request,
 within 10 days of receipt of the notice, a public hearing.

(c) If timely requested by the respondent or ordered by the commissioner, a public hearing before the Administrative Law Bureau of the department shall be held within 30 days after the notice is served. Within 20 days after the hearing, the administrative law judge shall issue findings of fact and a proposed order. The commissioner shall issue his or her final order or the proposed order shall become the final order of the commissioner within 30 working days after the hearing unless reconsideration is granted for good cause by the administrative law judge. If the notice issued to the respondent assessed a penalty of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more and the respondent has timely requested, the hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all
 the powers granted therein.

(d) The final order of the commissioner may contain one or more of the remedies set forth in this article. The amount of any penalty assessed need not be limited to the amount stated in the notice to the respondent.

(e) In addition to the penalties set forth in this section and any other penalties provided by law, the commissioner may suspend an insurer’s certificate of authority under Section 704 or assess a penalty under Section 704.7 if the commissioner finds, after notice and hearing, that the insurer has violated this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter or that the insurer has knowingly permitted any person or entity to do so.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1132, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.6.

(a) The commissioner shall, by June 1 of each year, jointly design the format and content of a consumer rate guide for long-term care insurance with a working group that includes representatives of the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program, the insurance industry, and insurance agents. The commissioner shall annually prepare the consumer rate guide for long-term care insurance that shall include, but not be limited to, the
 following information:

(1) A comparison of the different types of long-term care insurance and coverages available to California consumers and a specimen outline of coverage for each product currently marketed by each insurer listed in the rate guide.

(2) A premium history of each insurer that writes long-term care policies for all the types of long-term care insurance and coverages issued by the insurer in California.

(b) The consumer rate guide to be prepared by the commissioner shall consist of two parts: a history of the rates for all policies issued in California for the current year and for nine preceding years, and a comparison of the policies, benefits, and sample premiums for all policies currently being issued for delivery in California.

(1) For the rate history portion of the rate guide required by this section, the department shall collect, and each insurer shall provide to the department, all of the following information for each long-term care policy, including all policies, whether issued by the insurer or purchased or acquired from another insurer, issued in California for the current year and for nine preceding years:

(A) Company name.

(B) Policy type.

(C) Policy form identification.

(D) Dates sold.

(E) Date acquired (if applicable).

(F) Premium rate increases requested.

(G) Premium rate increases approved.

(H) Dates of premium rate increase approvals.

(I) Any other information requested by the department.

(2) For the policy comparison portion of the rate guide required by this section, the department shall collect, and each insurer shall provide to the department, the information needed to complete the following form, along with any other information requested by the department, for each long-term care policy currently issued for delivery in California, including all policies, whether issued by the insurer or purchased or acquired from another insurer:

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

 NOTICE OF INCOMPLETE TEXT: The Insurance Company
 Policy 
 Information form appears in the hard-copy publication of the 
 chaptered bill. See Sec. 12, Chapter 304 (p. 13), Statutes of 2016.

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *If an insurer does not offer a policy for sale that fits the criteria set forth in the sample premium portion of the policy comparison section of the rate guide, the department shall include in that section of the form for that policy a statement explaining that a policy fitting that criteria is not offered by the insurer and that the consumer may seek, from an agent, sample premium information for the insurer’s policy that most closely resembles the policy in the sample.

The department shall use the format set forth in this section for the policy comparison portion of the rate guide, unless the working group convened pursuant to
 subdivision (a) designs an alternative format and agrees that it should be used instead.

In compiling the policy comparison portion of the rate guide, the department shall separate the group policies from the individual policies available for sale so that group policies for all insurers appear together in the guide and individual policies for all insurers appear together in the guide.

The policy comparison portion of the rate guide shall contain a cross-reference for each policy form listed indicating the page in the rate guide where rate information on the policy form can be found.

(c) The department shall publish, on the department’s Internet Web site, a premium history of each insurer that writes long-term care policies for all the types of long-term care insurance and coverages issued by the insurer in each state. Each insurer shall provide to the
 department all of the information listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) for each long-term care policy, including all policies, whether issued by the insurer or purchased or acquired from another insurer, issued in the United States for the current year and for the nine preceding years.

(d) Insurers shall provide the information required pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) no later than July 31 of each year, commencing in 2000.

(e) The consumer rate guide shall be published no later than December 1 of each year commencing in 2000, and shall be distributed using all of the following methods:

(1) Through Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program (HICAP) offices.

(2) By telephone using the department’s consumer toll-free telephone number.

(3) On the department’s Internet Web site.

(4) A notice in the Long-Term Care Insurance Personal Worksheet required by Section 10234.95.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the data submitted by insurers to the department pursuant to this section are public records, and shall be open to inspection by members of the public pursuant to the procedures of the California Public Records Act. However, a trade secret, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code, is not subject to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 304, Sec. 12.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Note: See published chaptered bill for complete section text. The Insurance Company Policy Information form appears on page 13 of Ch. 304.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.7.

The commissioner’s annual report to the Legislature, as required by Section 10234.6, shall be compiled in consultation with a task force designated by the commissioner for this purpose, which shall include insurance industry representatives, other individuals deemed appropriate by the commissioner, and one or more representatives from each of the following:

(a) The Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program.

(b) The California Health Policy and Data Advisory Commission.

The commissioner shall have the responsibility, in consultation with the task force, to develop analytic methods and to select indicators for evaluation of the impact of long-term care insurance on the public share of costs for long-term care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1273, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.7. Consumer Protection [10234.8. - 10234.97.]

10234.8.

(a) With regard to long-term care insurance, all insurers, brokers, agents, and others engaged in the business of insurance owe a policyholder or a prospective policyholder a duty of honesty, and a duty of good faith and fair dealing.

(b) Conduct of an insurer, broker, or agent during the offer and sale of a policy previous to the purchase is relevant to any action alleging a breach of the duty of honesty, and a duty of good faith and fair dealing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 442, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.85.

No insurer, broker, agent, or other person shall cause a policyholder to replace a long term care insurance policy unnecessarily. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow an insurer, broker, agent, or other person to cause a policyholder to replace a long term care insurance policy that will result in a decrease in benefits and an increase in premium.

It shall be presumed that any third or greater policy sold to a policyholder in any 12-month period is unnecessary within the meaning of this section. This section shall not apply to those instances in which a policy is replaced solely for the purpose of consolidating policies with a single insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 631, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.86.

(a) Every insurer shall maintain records for each agent of that agent’s amount of replacement sales as a percent of the agent’s total annual sales and the amount of lapses of long-term care insurance policies sold by the agent as a percent of the agent’s total annual sales.

(b) Every insurer shall report annually by June 30, the 10 percent of its agents in the state with the greatest percentage of lapses and replacements as measured by subdivision (a).

(c) Every insurer shall report annually by June 30, the number of lapsed policies as a percent of its total annual sales in the state, as a percent of its total number
 of policies in force in the state, and as a total number of each policy form in the state, as of the end of the preceding calendar year.

(d) Every insurer shall report annually by June 30, the number of replacement policies sold as a percent of its total annual sales in the state and as a percent of its total number of policies in force in the state as of the end of the preceding calendar year.

(e) Reported replacement and lapse rates do not alone constitute a violation of insurance laws or imply wrongdoing. The reports are for the purpose of reviewing more closely agent activities regarding the sale of long-term care insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 426, Sec. 7.   (SB 712)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.87.

(a) If an insurer replaces a policy or certificate that it has previously issued, the insurer shall recognize past insured status by granting premium credits toward the premiums for the replacement policy or certificate. The premium credits shall equal five percent of the annual premium of the prior policy or certificate for each full year the prior policy or certificate was in force. The premium credit shall be applied toward all future premium payments for the replacement policy or certificate, but the cumulative credit allowed need not exceed 50 percent. No credit need be provided if a claim has been filed under the original policy or certificate.

(b) The cumulative credits allowed need not reduce the premium for the replacement policy or certificate to less than the premium of the original policy or certificate.

(c) This section shall not apply to life insurance policies that accelerate benefits for long-term care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1067, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.9.

(a) Every insurer providing long-term care coverage in California shall provide a copy of any advertisement intended for use in California to the commissioner for review at least 30 days before dissemination. The advertisement shall comply with all laws in California. In addition, the advertisement shall be retained by the insurer in accordance with Section 10508 for at least three years.

(b) An advertisement designed to produce leads must prominently disclose that “an insurance agent will contact you” if that is the case.

(c) An agent, broker, or other person who contacts a consumer as a result of receiving information generated by a cold lead device, shall immediately disclose that fact to the consumer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1132, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.93.

(a) Every insurer of long-term care in California shall:

(1) Establish marketing procedures to ensure that any comparison of policies by its agents or other producers will be fair and accurate.

(2) Establish marketing procedures to ensure excessive insurance is not sold or issued.

(3) Submit to the commissioner within six months of the effective date of this act, a list of all agents or other insurer representatives authorized to solicit individual consumers for the sale of long-term care insurance. These submissions shall be updated at least semiannually.

(4) Provide the following training and require that each agent or other insurer representative authorized to solicit individual consumers for the sale of long-term care insurance shall satisfactorily complete the following training requirements that, for resident licensees, shall count toward the licensee’s continuing education requirement, but may still result in completing more than the minimum number of continuing education hours set forth in this section:

(A) For licensees issued a license after January 1, 1992, eight hours of training in each of the first four 12-month periods beginning from the date of original license issuance and thereafter eight hours of training prior to each license renewal.

(B) For licensees issued a license before January 1, 1992, eight hours of training prior to each license renewal.

(C) For nonresident licensees that are not otherwise subject to the continuing education requirements set forth in Section 1749.3, the evidence of training required by this section shall be filed with and approved by the commissioner as provided in subdivision (g) of Section 1749.4.

Licensees shall complete the initial training requirements of this section prior to being authorized to solicit individual consumers for the sale of long-term care insurance.

The training required by this section shall consist of topics related to long-term care services and long-term care insurance, including, but not limited to, California regulations and requirements, available long-term care services and facilities, changes or improvements in services or facilities, and alternatives to the purchase of private long-term care insurance. On or before July 1, 1998, the following
 additional training topics shall be required: differences in eligibility for benefits and tax treatment between policies intended to be federally qualified and those not intended to be federally qualified, the effect of inflation in eroding the value of benefits and the importance of inflation protection, and NAIC consumer suitability standards and guidelines.

(5) Display prominently on page one of the policy or certificate and the outline of coverage: “Notice to buyer: This policy may not cover all of the costs associated with long-term care incurred by the buyer during the period of coverage. The buyer is advised to review carefully all policy limitations.”

(6) Inquire and otherwise make every reasonable effort to identify whether a prospective applicant or enrollee for long-term care insurance already has accident and sickness or long-term care insurance and the types and
 amounts of any such insurance.

(7) Every insurer or entity marketing long-term care insurance shall establish auditable procedures for verifying compliance with this subdivision.

(8) Every insurer shall provide to a prospective applicant, at the time of solicitation, written notice that the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program (HICAP) provides health insurance counseling to senior California residents free of charge. Every agent shall provide the name, address, and telephone number of the local HICAP program and the statewide HICAP number, 1-800-434-0222.

(9) Provide a copy of the long-term care insurance shoppers guide developed by the California Department of Aging to each prospective applicant prior to the presentation of an application or enrollment form for insurance.

(10) Clearly post on its Internet Web site and provide written notice at the time of solicitation that a specimen individual policy form or group master policy and certificate form for each policy form offered in this state is available to a prospective applicant upon request. The individual specimen policy form or group master policy and certificate form shall be provided to a requesting party within 15 calendar days of receipt of a request.

(b) In addition to other unfair trade practices, including those identified in this code, the following acts and practices are prohibited:

(1) Twisting. Knowingly making any misleading representation, incomplete, or fraudulent comparison of any insurance policies or insurers for the purpose of inducing, or tending to induce, any person to lapse, forfeit, surrender, terminate,
 retain, pledge, assign, borrow on, or convert any insurance policy or to take out a policy of insurance with another insurer.

(2) High pressure tactics. Using any method of marketing having the effect of or tending to induce the purchase of insurance through force, fright, threat, whether explicit or implied, or undue pressure to purchase or recommend the purchase of insurance.

(3) Cold lead advertising. Making use directly or indirectly of any method of marketing that fails to disclose in a conspicuous manner that a purpose of the method of marketing is solicitation of insurance and that contact will be made by an insurance agent or insurance company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 102.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.95.

(a) Every insurer or other entity marketing long-term care insurance shall:

(1) Develop and use suitability standards to determine whether the purchase or replacement of long-term care insurance is appropriate for the needs of the applicant.

(2) Train its agents in the use of its suitability standards.

(3) Maintain a copy of its suitability standards and make them available for inspection upon request by the commissioner.

(b) The agent and insurer shall develop
 procedures that take into consideration, when determining whether the applicant meets the standards developed by the insurer, the following:

(1) The ability to pay for the proposed coverage and other pertinent financial information related to the purchase of the coverage.

(2) The applicant’s goals or needs with respect to long-term care and the advantages and disadvantages of insurance to meet these goals or needs.

(3) The value, benefits, and costs of the applicant’s existing insurance, if any, when compared to the values, benefits, and costs of the recommended purchase or replacement.

(c) (1) The issuer, and where an agent is involved,
 the agent, shall make reasonable efforts to obtain the information set out in subdivision (b). The efforts shall include presentation to the applicant, at or prior to application, of the “Long-Term Care Insurance Personal Worksheet,” contained in the Long-Term Care Insurance Model Regulations of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. The personal worksheet used by the insurer shall contain, at a minimum, the information in the NAIC worksheet in not less than 12-point type. The insurer may request the applicant to provide additional information to comply with its suitability standards.

(2) In the premium section of the personal worksheet, the insurer shall disclose all rate increases and rate increase requests for all policies, whether issued by the insurer or purchased or acquired from another insurer, in the United
 States for the current year and for nine preceding years.

(3) The premium section shall include a statement that reads as follows: “A rate guide is available that compares the policies sold by different insurers, the benefits provided in those policies, and sample premiums. The rate guide also provides a history of the rate increases, if any, for the policies issued by different insurers in each state in which they do business, for the current year and for the nine preceding years. You can obtain a copy of this rate guide by calling the Department of Insurance’s consumer toll-free telephone number (1-800-927-HELP), by calling the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program (HICAP) toll-free telephone number (1-800-434-0222), or by accessing the Department of Insurance’s Internet Web site (www.insurance.ca.gov).” If the personal
 worksheet is approved prior to the availability of the rate guide, the worksheet shall indicate that the rate guide will be available beginning December 1, 2000.

(4) A copy of the issuer’s personal worksheet shall be filed and approved by the commissioner. A new personal worksheet shall be filed and approved by the commissioner each time a rate is increased in California and each time a new policy is filed for approval by the commissioner. The new personal worksheet shall disclose the amount of the rate increase in California and all prior rate increases for the nine preceding years in California as well as all prior rate increases and rate increase requests or filings in any other state for the nine preceding years. The new personal worksheet shall be used by the insurer within 60 days of approval by the commissioner in place of the
 previously approved personal worksheet.

(d) A completed personal worksheet shall be returned to the issuer prior to the issuer’s consideration of the applicant for coverage, except the personal worksheet need not be returned for sale of employer group long-term care insurance to employees and their spouses and dependents.

(e) The sale or dissemination outside the company or agency by the issuer or agent of information obtained through the personal worksheet is prohibited.

(f) The issuer shall use the suitability standards it has developed pursuant to this section in determining whether issuing long-term care insurance coverage to an applicant is appropriate.

(g) Agents shall use the suitability standards developed by the insurer in marketing long-term care insurance.

(h) If the issuer determines that the applicant does not meet its financial suitability standards, or if the applicant has declined to provide the information, the issuer may reject the application. Alternatively, the issuers shall send the applicant a letter similar to the “Long-Term Care Insurance Suitability Letter” contained in the Long-Term Care Model Regulations of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. However, if the applicant has declined to provide financial information, the issuer may use some other method to verify the applicant’s intent. Either the applicant’s returned letter or a record of the alternative method of verification shall be made part of the applicant’s file.

(i) The insurer shall report annually to the commissioner the total number of applications received from residents of this state, the number of those who declined to provide information on the personal worksheet, the number of applicants who did not meet the suitability standards, and the number who chose to conform after receiving a suitability letter.

(j) This section shall not apply to life insurance policies that accelerate benefits for long-term care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 304, Sec. 13.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.97.

(a) Any time long-term care coverage is replaced, the sales commission that is paid by the insurer and that represents the percentage of the sale normally paid for first year sales of long-term care policies or certificates shall be calculated based on the difference between the annual premium of the replacement coverage and that of the original coverage. If the premium on the replacement product is less than or equal to the premium for the product being replaced, the sales commission shall be limited to the percentage of sale normally paid for renewal of long-term care policies or certificates. Replacement shall be contingent upon the insurer’s declaration that the replacement policy materially improves the position of the insured, pursuant to Section 10235.16. This provision does not apply to replacement coverage which is group insurance as described in subdivision (a) of Section 10231.6.

(b) For purposes of this section, “commission or other compensation” includes pecuniary or nonpecuniary remuneration of any kind relating to the sale or renewal of the policy or certificate including, but not limited to, bonuses, gifts, prizes, awards, and finder’s fees.

(c) Every long-term care insurer shall file with the commissioner within six months of the effective date of this section, its commission structure or an explanation of the insurer’s compensation plan. Any amendments to the commission structure shall be filed with the commissioner before implementation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 316, Sec. 1.   Effective August 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Implementation [10235. - 10236.15.]

10235.

Except as provided in Section 10235.95, this article applies to all long-term care insurance policies delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after January 1, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 171, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.2.

No long-term care insurance policy delivered or issued for delivery in this state shall use the terms set forth below, unless the terms are defined in the policy and the definitions satisfy the following requirements:

(a) “Medicare” shall be defined as the “Health Insurance for the Aged Act,” Title XVIII of the Social Security Amendments of 1965 as then constituted or later amended, or Title I, Part I of Public Law 89-97, as enacted by the 89th Congress of the United States of America and
 popularly known as the Health Insurance for the Aged Act, as then constituted and any later amendments or substitutes thereof, or words of similar import.

(b) “Skilled nursing care,” “intermediate care,” “home health care,” and other services shall be defined in relation to the level of skill required, the nature of the care and the setting in which care is required to be delivered. 

(c) All providers of services, including, but not limited to, skilled nursing facilities, intermediate care facilities, and home health agencies shall be defined in relation to the services and facilities required to be available and the licensure or degree status of those providing or supervising the services. The definition may require that the provider be appropriately licensed or certified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 947, Sec. 9.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.8.

No policy may be delivered or issued for delivery in this state as long-term care insurance if the policy limits or excludes coverage by type of illness, treatment, medical condition, or accident, except as to the following:

(a) Preexisting conditions or diseases.

(b) Alcoholism and drug addiction.

(c) Illness, treatment, or a medical condition arising out of any of the following:

(1) War or act of war, whether declared or undeclared.

(2) Participation in a felony, riot, or
 insurrection.

(3) Service in the Armed Forces or units auxiliary thereto.

(4) Suicide, whether or not the person had mental capacity to control what he or she was doing, attempted suicide, or intentionally self-inflicted injury.

(5) Aviation in the capacity of a non-fare-paying passenger.

(d) Treatment provided in a government facility, unless otherwise required by law, services for which benefits are available under Medicare or other governmental programs (except Medi-Cal or medicaid), state or federal workers’ compensation, employer’s liability or occupational disease law, or a motor vehicle no fault law, services provided by a member of the covered person’s immediate family, and services for which no charge is normally made in the absence of
 insurance.

(e) This section does not prohibit exclusions and limitations by type of provider or territorial limitations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 45.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.9.

(a) Every insurer shall report annually by June 30 the total number of claims denied by each class of business in the state and the number of these claims denied for failure to meet the waiting period or because of a preexisting condition as of the end of the preceding calendar year.

(b) The insurer shall provide every policyholder or certificate holder whose claim is denied a written notice within 40 days of the date of denial of the reasons for the denial and all information
 directly related to the denial. Insurers shall annually report to the department the number of denied claims.

(c) The department shall make available to the public, upon request, the denial rate of claims by insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 699, Sec. 12.   Effective October 6, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.9a.
